Utah statutes.
63J-7-202.   Judicial council to approve certain grant requests.

(1) (a)  Before obligating the state to accept or receive a grant, a judicial branch agency shall submit a grant summary to the Judicial Council for its approval or rejection when:

(i)  the state would receive a grant of at least $10,000 but no more than $50,000 if the grant is approved;

(ii)  receipt of the grant will require no additional permanent full-time employees, additional permanent part-time employees, or combination of additional permanent full-time employees and permanent part-time employees; and

(iii)  no new state money will be required to match the grant.

(b)  The Judicial Council shall report each grant authorized under this section to:

(i)  the Legislature's Executive Appropriations Committee; and

(ii)  the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst.

(2)  The Judicial Council shall approve or reject each grant submitted under the authority of this section.

(3) (a)  If the Judicial Council approves the grant, the judicial branch agency may accept the grant.

(b)  If the Judicial Council rejects the grant, the judicial branch agency may not accept the grant.

(4)  If a judicial branch agency fails to obtain the Judicial Council's approval under this section, the Judicial Council may require the agency to return the grant.

